Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3883
Prudent investor rule.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a trustee who invests and manages trust assets owes a duty to the beneficiaries of the trust to comply with the prudent investor rule set forth in sections 30-3883 to 30-3889.

(b) The prudent investor rule, a default rule, may be expanded, restricted, eliminated, or otherwise altered by the provisions of a trust. A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary to the extent that the trustee acted in reasonable reliance on the provisions of the trust.

Laws 1997, LB 54, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 8-2202;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 83.